Louisiana, session 2026, HB1104.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:406 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§406. Motor vehicle key programming and emulating devices
A. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Motor vehicle key programming or emulating device" means any
device, computer program, application, or software designed or used to electronically
communicate with a motor vehicle for the purpose of programming or emulating a
motor vehicle key fob that is capable of being used to unlock or start the motor
vehicle.
(2) "Relay attack device" means any device, computer program, application,
or software designed or used to intercept the signal from the key fob of a motor
vehicle to unlock or start the motor vehicle.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1104 ENROLLED
B.(1) Except as provided in Subsection C of this Section, no person shall
knowingly manufacture, sell, offer to sell, or transfer a motor vehicle key
programming or emulating device or a relay attack device. No person shall
knowingly possess such a device under circumstances indicating an intent to use or
permit the use of the device to commit a theft, unauthorized entry into a motor
vehicle, or any other criminal offense.
(a) Possession alone of a motor vehicle key programming or emulating
device or a relay attack device does not constitute a violation of this Section.
(b) Criminal intent may be inferred from the circumstances, including but
not limited to the following:
(i) Possession while attempting to enter a motor vehicle without
authorization.
(ii) Possession of multiple such devices without a lawful purpose.
(iii) Possession in conjunction with tools commonly used for vehicle theft.
(2) Whoever violates Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall be fined not
more than one thousand dollars or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
C. This Section does not apply to the manufacture, sale, offer to sell,
transfer, or use of a motor vehicle key programming or emulating device or a relay
attack device for a lawful and reasonable purpose by or to a law enforcement officer,
an employee of the National Insurance Crime Bureau, or an employee of a licensed
dealer, distributor, or manufacturer of motor vehicles or motor vehicle locks, a motor
vehicle mechanic shop, locksmith company, or repossession agency.
D.(1) A person authorized to manufacture, sell, offer to sell, transfer, or
possess a motor vehicle key programming or emulating device or a relay attack
device, or aid or permit another to use a motor vehicle key programming or
emulating device or a relay attack device, shall report the loss or theft of such device
to a law enforcement agency within the jurisdiction where the device is known or
reasonably believed to have been lost or stolen, within forty-eight hours after
becoming aware of the loss or theft.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1104 ENROLLED
(2) Whoever violates Paragraph (1) of this Subsection shall be fined not
more than one thousand dollars or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.